Washington statutes.
RCW 18.380.050

Licensure or certification requirements.

(1) The secretary shall issue a license to an applicant who submits a completed application, pays the appropriate fees, and meets the following requirements:

(a) For a licensed behavior analyst:

(i) Graduation from a master's or doctorate degree program in behavior analysis or other natural science, education, human services, engineering, medicine, or field related to behavior analysis approved by the secretary;

(ii) Completion of a minimum of two hundred twenty-five classroom hours at graduate level instruction in specific behavior analysis topics, as determined in rule;

(iii) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement, consisting of a minimum of one thousand five hundred hours, or an alternative approved by the secretary by rule; and

(iv) Successful completion of an examination approved by the secretary;

(b) For a licensed assistant behavior analyst:

(i) Graduation from a bachelor's degree program approved by the secretary;

(ii) Completion of one hundred thirty-five classroom hours of instruction in specific behavior analysis topics, as determined by the secretary in rule; and

(iii) Successful completion of a supervised experience requirement, consisting of a minimum of one thousand hours, or an alternative approved by the secretary by rule;

(c) For a certified behavior technician:

(i) Successful completion of a training program of at least forty hours that is approved by the secretary; and

(ii) Any other requirements determined by the secretary in rule;

(d) Demonstrates good moral character;

(e) Has not engaged in unprofessional conduct as defined in RCW 18.130.180;

(f) Is not currently subject to any disciplinary proceedings; and

(g) Is not unable to practice with reasonable skill and safety as defined in RCW 18.130.170.

(2) In addition, an applicant for an assistant behavior analyst license or a behavior technician certification must provide proof of ongoing supervision by a licensed behavior analyst.

(3) The secretary may accept certification by a national accredited professional credentialing entity in lieu of the specific requirements identified in subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section.

(4) A license or certification issued under this section is valid for a period of two years.

[ 2015 c 118 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 c 118: See note following RCW 18.380.010.